North Dakota, session 69, HB1467.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 23-12-22 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
23-12-22. Vaccine adverse event data - Website.
The department of health and human services shall prominently:
1. Prominently display, on a website maintained by the department, a link to the federal
vaccine adverse event reporting system, along with instructions on how to report an
adverse event and how to access state-specific data. The department may compile its
own data for use on this website.; and
2. By July first of each even - numbered year, provide a report to the legislative
management of all state-specific data and a summary of all reported data nationally.
Page No. 1 25.0296.04000